trmorph.xfst
!
! Replace intermediate symbol @CAUS with the correct form of causative suffix
!
!
! Except in lexical exceptions handled in morphotactics, the passive suffix 
! is -t after a `l', `r' or vowel, otherwise it is -DIr.

define Causative  %@CAUS -> t          // [Vall | l | r] IntSym*  _ %@MB 
              ,,  %@CAUS -> %^D %^I r  // \[Vall | l | r] Boundary+  _ %@MB;

!
! Optative 3s form change
!
!
! After third person agreement suffixes optative suffix disappears. We mark
! this with symbol @opt3 in morphotactics, so that it is easy to spot it
! here.
!

define Optative3  %^%(y%) %^A -> 0 || Boundary _ %@MB %@opt3
              .o. %@opt3 -> 0;

!
! Insert space before question particle
!
!
! Even though it is normally written separately, correct analysis of the 
! question particle -mI requires the knowledge of the previous word 
! (generally verb). The following allows correct analysis in such
! cases given that the input is tokenized accordingly (keeping the
! preceding verbal form and the question particle within the same
! token). 
!
! Furthermore, people tend not to obey the rules, and do not leave
! space between the question particle and the preceding word. As a
! making this insertion optional allows us to analyze less formal
! writing like blog posts or internet forums.

define SpaceBeforeMI    %@miSPC -> [0|" "];

!
! Negative Aorist
!
!
! Aorist suffix becomes -z after negative marker -mA, and before first
! person suffixes it gets dropped completely.
!

define NegAorist  %^%(I%) r -> z || Boundary m %^A %@MB  
                                   _ %@MB
            .o. z -> 0 || Boundary m %^A %@MB 
                         _ %@MB %^%(y%) %^I [m | z] %@MB
            .o. %^%(y%) %^I -> 0 || Boundary m %^A %@MB %@MB
                                   _ m %@MB;

!
! Buffer deletion
!

define NonBufCons [Cons | ConsXX ];
define DelBufCons [ConsBuf -> 0 || [Cons | ConsXX] [IntSym | AposSym]* _ ]
                  .o. [ %^%(y%) -> y,, 
                        %^%(s%) -> s,,
                        %^%(ş%) -> ş,,
                        %^%(n%) -> n 
                      ];

define DelBufVow [Vbuf -> 0 || [Vowel | Vxx ] [IntSym | AposSym]* _ ] 
             .o. [ %^%(I%) -> %^I ,,
                   %^%(A%) -> %^A ] ;

define DeleteBuffer DelBufCons .o. DelBufVow ;

!
! de/ye exception
!
!
! final `e' becomes `i' in some verbal roots before a suffix starting
! with  `y'.
!

define DeYeException e -> i || .#. [d|y] _ %@RB Boundary* y ;

!
! -yor exception
!
!
! `a' `e' and underspecified low-unrounded vowel `A' becomes
! corresponding high vowel before the suffix -yor
!
! We change all to ^I here and let the vowel harmony do the rest.

define YorException [a|e|%^A] -> %^I || _ Boundary (%^I) y o r %@MB;

!
! Clitic mI
!
!
! We analyze question particle mI as a clitic. It normally follows
! vowel harmony according to the preceding word. But we allow all
! combinations here. This option overgenerates.
!
!define CliticMI %^I -> [ı|i|u|ü] || .#. m _ %@RB;

!
! vowel epenthesis: burun -> burnu
!
!
! Delete vowels after @DEL@ from lexically marked words 
! if they are suffixed a morpheme starting with a vowel.
!

define VowelEpenthesis [ Vowel -> 0 ||  _ %@DEL%@ ConsAll IntSym* Vall ]
                   .o. %@DEL%@ -> 0;


!
! Vowel Harmony
!
! We also delete `palatalized' vowels at the end since they are
! only used for vowel harmony.
!

define DelPV %^pA -> a , %^pI -> ı, %^pO -> o, %^pU -> u ;

define VowelHarmony [ %^I -> ı  //  Vbu          \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> u  //  Vbr          \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> ü  //  [Vfr | %^pO | %^pU] \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^I -> i  //  [Vfu | %^pA | %^pI] \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> a  //  Vb           \Vall* _  ,,
                      %^A -> e  //  [Vf | Vpal]  \Vall* _  ]
               .o. DelPV;

!
! Final stop devoicing
!
!
! NOTE: reduplication should be done after this one.
!

define FSDevoicing  [%^c -> c,
                     %^g -> ğ,
                     %^K -> y,
                     %^p -> b,
                     %^t -> d ||    _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]  ]
                .o.  %^k -> ğ || \n _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]
                .o.  %^k -> g || n  _ IntSym* [ Vowel | Vxx ]
                .o. [%^c -> ç,
                     %^g -> g,
                     %^K -> k,
                     %^p -> p,
                     %^t -> t,
                     %^k -> k];

!
! Voicing assimilation
!

define VoicingAssimilation  [ %^D -> t , 
                              %^C -> ç  || ConsUV [ IntSym | AposSym]* _ ]
                       .o.  [ %^D -> d,
                              %^C -> c ];

!
! Reduplication of some root final consonants (gemination)
!         hak -> hakkı



define RedupGen     %@DUP%@ -> %@DUPL || _ Cons IntSym* Vall
                .o. [..] -> %@DUPR || %@DUPL ? _ 
                .o. [..] -> %@DUPL Cons %@DUPR || %@DUPL ? %@DUPR _ ;

define Redup _eq(RedupGen, %@DUPL, %@DUPR)
         .o. %@DUP%@ | %@DUPL | %@DUPR -> 0;

!
! Delete silent phonemes
!

define DeleteSilentP [ Vsilent | ConsSilent ] -> 0;

!
! ki -> kü
!
! the suffix ki may be realized as kü if the preceding vowel is `ü'
! this seems to be mostly optional with varying degree of preference
! over one or the other  based on the root form. For example, it is
! more likely to hear 'dünkü' but 'gülünki'.

define KiKu i (->)  ü || ü [\Vall]* Boundary k _ %@MB ;

!
! Filter for cleaning up the intermediate symbols in the analysis level
! we also deal with adding -sI to compound noun roots, since we use a
! special notation in lexicon and leave the -(s)I out in lexical entries.
! 
!

define AFilter    FSDevoicing.i 
              .o. VowelHarmony.i 
              .o. DeleteBuffer.i
              .o. %^%(s%) %^I  <- %@NCOMP
              .o. 0 <- %@DEL%@ 
              .o. 0 <- %@DELS%@ 
              .o. 0 <- %@DUP%@
              .o. 0 <- %@dB
              .o. %<cv%_ir%> <- %<t%_aor%> %<cv%_ir%>;


define DeleteBoundary ["@MB" | "@RB"] -> 0 ;

!
! Delete Circumflex
!
! The vowels with circumflex î, û, â are written without circumflex
! most of the time. We optionally delete the accent from the surface.

define DeleteCircumflex î (->) ı, Î (->) I, 
                        û (->) u, Û (->) U, 
                        â (->) a, Â (->) A;

!
! Allow capitalization, normally this should happen only at the
! beginning of a sentence.
!
!

define Capitalize a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, ç (->) Ç, d (->) D, 
        e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G, ğ (->) Ğ, h (->) H, ı (->) I, i (->) İ, 
        j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, ö (->) Ö, 
        p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, ş (->) Ş, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü, 
        v (->) V, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, î (->) Î, û (->) Û, â (->) Â || .#. _ ;

!
! Accept All-capitals text. For this to work properly, it should be
! composed with Capitalize above.
!
! Second bit makes sure that once we start capitalizing the word, we
! go all the way  to the end. No half capitalization.
!
define CAP [A|B|C|Ç|D|E|F|G|Ğ|H|I|İ|J|K|L|M|N|O|Ö|P|R|S|Ş|T|U|Ü|V|Y|Z|Î|Û|Â];
define AllCaps a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, ç (->) Ç, d (->) D, 
        e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G, ğ (->) Ğ, h (->) H, ı (->) I, i (->) İ, 
        j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, ö (->) Ö, 
        p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, ş (->) Ş, t (->) T, u (->) U, ü (->) Ü, 
        v (->) V, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, î (->) Î, û (->) Û, â (->) Â 
        // CAP _ 
    .o. a -> A, b -> B, c -> C, ç -> Ç, d -> D, 
        e -> E, f -> F, g -> G, ğ -> Ğ, h -> H, ı -> I, i -> İ, 
        j -> J, k -> K, l -> L, m -> M, n -> N, o -> O, ö -> Ö, 
        p -> P, r -> R, s -> S, ş -> Ş, t -> T, u -> U, ü -> Ü, 
        v -> V, y -> Y, z -> Z, î -> Î, û -> Û, â -> Â 
        // CAP CAP _;


!
! Put all of them together. The order is important. 
!
clear stack
read regex     AFilter
           .o. Lexicon 
           .o. replaceApos
           .o. NumberSpace
           .o. NumericInsSilentP
           .o. NumericSeparator
           .o. CompNoun
           .o. DeleteSI
           .o. DeleteLAR
           .o. InsertN
           .o. DelS
           .o. PronounExceptions
           .o. InsertY
           .o. iDeleteY
           .o. NbeforePassive
           .o. PassiveLN
           .o. Causative
           .o. Optative3
           .o. SpaceBeforeMI
           .o. NegAorist
           .o. DeleteBuffer
           .o. DeYeException
           .o. YorException
           .o. VowelEpenthesis
           .o. VowelHarmony 
           .o. FSDevoicing
           .o. VoicingAssimilation
           .o. Redup
           .o. DeleteSilentP
           .o. KiKu
           .o. DeleteCircumflex
           .o. DeleteBoundary
           .o. Capitalize
           .o. AllCaps ;

save stack trmorph.fst
